Florida, session 2026, HB1249.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection
(2) of section 379.3311, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
379.3311 Police powers of commission and its agents.—
(1) The commission, the executive director and the
executive director's assistants designated by her or him, and
each commission officer are constituted peace officers with the
power to make arrests for violations of the laws of this state
when committed in the presence of the officer or when committed
on lands under the supervision and management of the commission,
the department, the Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund, or the Department of Agriculture and
Consumer Services, including state parks, coastal and aquatic
managed areas, and greenways and trails. The general laws
applicable to arrests by peace officers of this state shall also
be applicable to such director, assistants, and commission
officers. Such persons may enter upon any land or waters of the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1249-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1249 2026
state in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as
a law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 943.10(1), for
performance of their lawful duties and may take with them any
necessary equipment, and such entry does not constitute a
trespass.
(2) Such officers may enforce throughout the state all
laws relating to game, nongame birds, fish, and fur-bearing
animals and all rules and regulations of the commission relating
to wild animal life, marine life, and freshwater aquatic life,
and in connection with such laws, rules, and regulations, in the
enforcement thereof and in the performance of their duties
thereunder, to:
(a) Go upon all premises in the same manner and subject to
the same requirements as a law enforcement officer, as defined
in s. 943.10(1), posted or otherwise;
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1249-00